North Dakota, session 69, HB1206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 39-08-01.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-08-01.2. Special punishment for causing injury or death while operating a vehicle while
under the influence of alcohol or any other drugs or substances - Penalty .
1. An individual is guilty of criminal vehicular homicide if the individual commits an offense under
section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance and as a result the individual causes a death of
another individual to occur, including the death of an unborn child, unless the individual who
causes the death of the unborn child is the mother. A violation of this subsection is a class A
felony. If an individual commits a violation under this subsection, the court shall impose at
least three years' imprisonment. If the individual violates this section after having been
previously convicted of a violation of section 39-08-01 or 39-08-03, or equivalent ordinance,
the court shall impose at least ten years' imprisonment. An individual may not be prosecuted
and found guilty of this and an offense under chapter 12.1-16 if the conduct arises out of the
same incident.
2. An individual is guilty of criminal vehicular injury if the individual violates section 39-08-01 or
equivalent ordinance and as a result that individual causes substantial bodily or serious bodily
injury to another individual. Violation of this subsection is a class C felony. If an individual
violates this subsection, the court shall impose at least one year's imprisonment. If the
individual violates this section after having been previously convicted of a violation of section
39-08-01 or 39-08-03 or equivalent ordinance, the court shall impose at least two years'
imprisonment.
3. The sentence under this section may not be suspended unless the court finds that manifest
injustice would result from the imposition of the sentence. Before a sentence under this
section applies, a defendant must be notified of the minimum mandatory sentence. The
elements of an offense under this section are the elements of an offense for a violation of
section 39-08-01 and the additional elements that create an offense in each subsection of this
section. Whether an individual caused death or substantial or serious bodily injury must be
determined in accordance with section 12.1-02-05.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 39-08-01.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
39-08-01.4. Driving while under the influence of alcohol or any other drugs or substances
while being accompanied by a minor - Penalty.
1. It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual who is at least twenty-one years of age to violate
section 39-08-01 if the violation occurred while a minor was accompanying the individual in a
motor vehicle. If an individual has a previous conviction for a violation of section 39-08-01.4, a

H. B. NO. 1206 - PAGE 2
violation of this section is a class C felony. An individual convicted under this section must be
sentenced in accordance with subsection 5 of section 39-08-01.
2. The minimum sentence for an individual convicted of violating this section must include:
a. For a first offense, a fine of seven hundred fifty dollars, at least two days' imprisonment,
an order for a substance abuse evaluation by an appropriate licensed addiction treatment
program, at least three hundred sixty days of unsupervised probation, and at least three
hundred sixty days' participation in the twenty - four seven sobriety program under chapter
54 - 12 as a mandatory condition of probation .
b. For a second or subsequent offense within fifteen years, at least one year and one day's
imprisonment, a fine of two thousand dollars, an order for a substance abuse evaluation
by an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program, at least two years' supervised
probation, and at least three hundred sixty days' participation in the twenty - four seven
sobriety program under chapter 54 - 12 as a mandatory condition of probation .
SECTION 3. APPLICATION. Section 2 of this Act applies to criminal charges filed after the effective
date of this Act.

H. B. NO. 1206 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1206.
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 15 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State